Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 2 Credit Union Deposit Insurance Corporation

Cross references.

Credit unions generally, §

7-1-630

et seq.

7-2-1.
Incorporation procedures.

Within one year after July 1, 1974, the duly authorized representatives of not less than three credit unions chartered and existing under the laws of this state may petition the Secretary of State for incorporation of a nonprofit credit union deposit insurance corporation, hereinafter referred to as the “corporation.” Such petition shall be accompanied by articles of incorporation in triplicate which shall include the following:

The name of the proposed corporation, which shall include the words “deposit insurance corporation,” and no corporation other than one incorporated pursuant to this chapter shall use the words in sequence “deposit insurance corporation”;

The location of its initial registered office;

The purpose and nature of the business of the corporation, which shall be to aid and assist any member financial institution which is in liquidation or facing liquidation due to insolvency in order that the deposits and shares of any member shall be insured or guaranteed against loss in such amounts as may from time to time be established by the board of directors of the corporation pursuant to this chapter;

Membership in the corporation, which shall be limited, except as otherwise expressly provided, to financial institutions, approved for membership by the directors of the corporation upon recommendation of the Department of Banking and Finance of this state, hereinafter referred to as the “department”; and

The term of existence of the corporation, which shall be perpetual unless otherwise limited.

Upon receipt of the articles, the Secretary of State shall forward one copy to the department.

Before the articles are approved by the department, an appropriate investigation shall be made by the department for the purpose of determining:

Whether the articles conform to this chapter;

The general character and fitness of the petitioners;

The economic advisability of establishing the proposed corporation; and

Whether such corporation would cause undue harm to a corporation already existent under this chapter.

Upon approval of the articles in writing by the department, such written approval shall be delivered to the Secretary of State.

Upon receipt of the approval of the department, the Secretary of State shall thereupon issue a certificate of incorporation to the petitioners.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1241, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment, “If It Quacks Like a Duck:
In Light of Today’s Financial Environment, Should Credit Unions Continue to Enjoy Tax Exemptions?,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1367 (2012).

7-2-2.
Amendments to articles.

Amendments to the articles of incorporation, adopted by a vote of two-thirds of the member financial institutions present at an annual meeting or a special meeting called for that purpose, shall be filed with the Secretary of State in the same manner as the original articles and shall become effective upon approval by the department and subsequent notification of the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 2.

7-2-3.
Adoption and amendment of bylaws.

At its organizational meeting, the membership of the corporation shall adopt bylaws to govern the operations of the corporation. These bylaws shall be submitted to the department for approval and, if found to be consistent with this chapter, conducive to the purposes for which the corporation was formed, and equitable to all members, the bylaws shall be approved by the department.

The original bylaws shall be adopted by and may thereafter be amended by a vote of at least a majority of the members present and voting at any regular meeting or special meeting called for such purpose. Bylaws may also be amended by the vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the board of directors of the corporation. Amendments adopted by the board may be rescinded at the next regular or special meeting of the members in the same manner as is provided for adoption of amendments by the members.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1690, § 1.

7-2-4.
Powers.

The corporation may:

Enter into contracts, including contracts for reinsurance;

Sue and be sued;

Adopt, use, and display a corporate seal;

Advance funds, in accordance with agreed terms and conditions, to aid member financial institutions to operate and to meet liquidity requirements;

Assume control of the property and business of any member financial institution upon the written direction of the department and operate the financial institution in accordance with the recommendations of the department;

Assist in the merger, consolidation, or liquidation of member financial institutions;

Receive money or other property from its member financial institutions or from any corporation, association, or person;

Invest its funds in such manner as permitted to credit unions under the laws of this state and in such other manner as may be approved by the department;

Borrow money from any source upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors may determine;

Purchase in its own name, hold, and convey property of any nature necessary for the convenient transaction of its business;

Receive by assignment or purchase from its members any property of any nature owned by those members;

Sell, assign, mortgage, encumber, or transfer property of any nature;

Declare and pay dividends on membership fees with the approval of the department; and

Adopt and amend bylaws, rules, and regulations carrying out the purposes of the corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 3.

7-2-5.
Membership — Acquisition and termination.

Any financial institution, as defined in Code Section 7-1-4 or chartered under the laws of the United States or of any state or territory of the United States, may become a member of the corporation upon application by its directors, recommendation of the department, and approval of the directors of the corporation.

Before making its recommendation, the department shall consider:

The history, financial condition, and management policies of the applicant;

The economic advisability of insuring the applicant without undue risk to the fund;

The general character and fitness of the applicant’s management; and

The convenience and needs of the members to be served by the applicant.

Membership in the corporation may be terminated upon 30 days’ written notice to the corporation and after providing evidence satisfactory to the department that alternate, comparable insurance of deposits has been obtained by the financial institution. Upon termination of membership, the financial institution shall be entitled to the refunds set forth in subsection (d) of Code Section 7-2-7.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 4.

7-2-6.
[Reserved] Membership — Financial institutions which are ineligible to be federally insured or which were chartered prior to July 1, 1981.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1241, § 3; and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 10, effective April 13, 1993.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 10 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 13, 1993.

7-2-6.1.
Powers and privileges of members.

Any financial institution insured by the corporation shall have the same powers and privileges as any other state-chartered financial institution of the same class even though such other financial institution is insured under some other state or federal program. Such equality of powers shall not relieve the financial institution, whether insured under this chapter or under an alternative state or federal program, from taking appropriate action to amend its articles of incorporation or bylaws or from obtaining appropriate regulatory approvals before exercising such powers and privileges.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1241, § 4.

7-2-7.
Membership fees; refunds of fees, assessments, and premiums; distribution of undivided corporate earnings preceding voluntary cessation of business.

Each financial institution accepted for membership shall be required to pay a membership fee of 1 percent of the deposits and shares of the financial institution up to $1 million, plus one-half of 1 percent of the deposits and shares from $1 million to $5 million, plus one-fourth of 1 percent of the deposits and shares over $5 million. Payment of the membership fee may be made in three equal installments, the first installment being due upon the approval of the application of the member financial institution and being in an amount of not less than $10.00 and the remaining two installments being due annually thereafter in amounts of not less than $10.00 each year.

The membership fee shall be maintained on an annual basis in the same ratio to deposits and shares as the original membership fee bore to the total of deposits and shares at the time the financial institution initially joined the corporation. Such annual adjustments to the membership fee shall be paid or refunded concurrently with the payment of the annual insurance premium and shall be calculated upon the same deposit and share base as is used in the calculation of the annual premium. The board of directors of the corporation with the approval of the department may authorize a different membership fee structure from that set forth in this Code section.

Membership fees, when paid by the individual member financial institution, may be charged to its regular reserve account or undivided earnings or may be established as an asset or charged in such other manner as may be approved by the department.

The membership fee of each member financial institution may be refunded in whole or in part to the extent that the unencumbered funds of the corporation exceed 2 percent of the aggregate total deposits and shares of the member financial institutions as determined by the most recent call report of condition submitted to the department. Special assessments levied pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 7-2-8 may be repaid in such manner as may be approved by the directors of the corporation with approval by the department. Refunds may be paid only to members of the corporation at the time of declaration by the directors of the corporation in proportion to their paid-in membership fees.

Upon termination or revocation of membership, other than through involuntary liquidation, the financial institution shall be entitled to refunds as follows:

Membership fees in full within 30 days;

Pro rata portion of annual premium which is unearned by the corporation in full within 30 days; and

Any special assessment in accordance with its terms, provided that the department may direct that such refunds be disbursed over a period of not more than 24 months at the request of the corporation where such disbursement will not cause an undue financial burden for the member financial institution.

Any financial institution which terminates its membership voluntarily within the 24 months immediately preceding any voluntary cessation of business by the corporation shall be entitled to a pro rata distribution of the undivided earnings of the corporation. Such distribution shall be the lesser of an amount equal to that portion of the retained earnings at the end of the fiscal year immediately preceding the termination of membership determined by the proportion of the terminating members’ membership fees to the total membership fees at the end of such fiscal year or the amount which would have been distributed had membership been retained until the final distribution.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1241, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1690, § 2; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that the department” for “provided the department” in paragraph (e)(3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “of” was substituted for “or” following “revocation” in subsection (e).

7-2-8.
Premiums and special assessments; distribution of assets on liquidation.

A regular annual premium, not to exceed one-twelfth of 1 percent of the deposits and shares of the member financial institution, shall be levied by the directors of the corporation. Such premium may be raised, lowered, waived, or refunded, in whole or in part, with prior approval by the department, in the event that the total funds held by the corporation justify or require such change. The corporation may charge its financial institutions variable rate premiums based upon determination of risk to the fund, provided that such risk rating is made according to formulas adopted by the directors of the corporation and approved by the department.

In the event of potential impairment of the corporation’s funds, special assessments may be levied by the directors of the corporation with the prior approval of the department, provided that such special assessments shall not exceed, in the aggregate, 1 percent of the deposits and shares of each member financial institution. Such special assessments shall be in the form of loans from the member financial institution to the corporation.

Membership fees, annual premiums, and special assessments shall be based upon deposits and shares of member financial institutions as reported to the department in its most recent call report of condition and shall be payable within 30 days of the date on which the corporation notifies its members of any such premium or assessment.

Annual premiums paid under this Code section shall be charged to the operating expenses of each member financial institution.

In the event of liquidation of the corporation, all assets remaining after the payment or provision for payment of all debts and taxes and expenses of liquidation, including distributions to former members as provided for in Code Section 7-2-7, shall be distributed to the then existing member financial institutions in proportion to their membership fees paid into the corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1690, § 3.

7-2-9.
Insurance of deposits and shares.

Upon receipt of the first installment of the prescribed membership fee from the financial institutions which have agreed to become members of the corporation as provided in this chapter, the corporation may commence its insurance of the deposits and shares of the member financial institutions.

Each insured financial institution may advise its members and advertise that its deposits and shares are insured by the corporation, in such manner established by the directors of the corporation and approved by the department, upon receipt of a notification from the corporation that it has been accepted for membership in the corporation by its directors and upon payment of any required premiums or fees.

The amount of insurance coverage on deposits and shares provided by the corporation may be increased from time to time by the directors of the corporation with the approval of the department; provided, however, that in no event may the insurance be increased to an amount greater than the largest amount insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration.

The corporation may insure or partially insure the uninsured shares and deposits of any financial institution primarily insured by it or some other governmental or private insurance program, at a cost to be determined by the directors of the corporation with the approval of the department, provided the department approves the financial institution for such coverage. Financial institutions having excess deposit insurance coverage shall not be required to be members of the corporation by virtue of such insurance coverage.

No other forms of insurance except that authorized by this Code section may be sold or offered by the corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 11.

7-2-10.
Conduct of business by incorporators and directors.

The corporation’s business shall be conducted by the incorporators, who shall serve until the organizational meeting of the corporation, at which time not less than three directors shall be elected by the members of the corporation in accordance with the bylaws. Thereafter, the corporation’s business shall be conducted by the directors.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 9.

7-2-11.
Exclusive supervision by department; rules and regulations.

The corporation shall not be deemed an insurance company within the meaning of the laws of the State of Georgia relating to insurance or providing for the supervision of insurance companies, but it shall be subject to the exclusive supervision of the department. The department shall exercise the same powers and authority over the corporation as is now or hereafter exercised over banks and credit unions under its jurisdiction and shall issue such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter.

Any other company which is engaged in the insurance of deposits in financial institutions in this state when approved by the department based upon the criteria set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 7-2-1 shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the department to the extent of its deposit insurance activities and to the same extent as a corporation organized pursuant to this chapter. Nothing contained in this chapter shall amend, modify, or otherwise restrict any authority or jurisdiction possessed by the Commissioner of Insurance prior to July 1, 1984. In the event a conflict exists between this chapter and Title 33, known as the “Georgia Insurance Code,” Title 33 shall control.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 10; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-23/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323.

7-2-12.
Copies of members’ reports sent to corporation; additional examinations or audits; ordering corrective action or revoking membership.

The department shall forward to the corporation copies or summaries of all examination reports of member financial institutions. In the event a summary is provided, the corporation may request a complete and full report.

The corporation may request the department to conduct additional examinations or to order independent audits of the records of member financial institutions. The department shall cooperate with the corporation upon such a request but shall use its discretion in determining the scope and timing of such additional examinations or audits.

If the directors of the corporation ascertain evidence of carelessness, unsound practices, or mismanagement of any member financial institution which appears to affect adversely the solvency of the financial institution or threatens undue loss to the corporation, the directors may order that corrective action be taken or revoke the membership of the financial institution in the corporation or recommend to the department that the financial institution be liquidated. The department shall be provided a copy of any such order or letter of revocation. In the event of revocation of its membership, the financial institution shall notify all of its members of such revocation and that the deposits and shares are no longer insured by the corporation, provided that, in the event membership is revoked, insurance coverage shall continue in effect for 180 days. No refund required by subsection (e) of Code Section 7-2-7 shall be payable until after insurance coverage is terminated.

If any member financial institution shall fail to pay any assessment, premium, or membership fee lawfully required under this chapter, the directors of the corporation shall notify the department, and the department shall forthwith notify the financial institution in writing. The failure of such financial institution to make such payment within 15 days after the said written notice may subject the financial institution to the sanctions set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 11; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 9.

7-2-13.
Administrative review of corporation or department decision; exhaustion of remedies.

If a financial institution is aggrieved by a decision or order of the corporation or if the corporation is aggrieved by a decision or order of the department, the financial institution or the corporation, as the case may be, shall, upon appropriate petition and after due notice, be entitled to a hearing and administrative review of the action before the department, which may stay enforcement of such actions pending the administrative review.

Judicial review of such decisions or orders, other than decisions or orders to revoke the membership of a financial institution, shall not be available unless the aggrieved party has sought administrative review under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 12; Ga. L. 1984, p. 952, § 10.

7-2-14.
Tax exemption.

The corporation shall be exempt from all state and local taxes except real property taxes.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 545, § 13.